Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.255

Prearrangement contracts—Insurance funded—Requirements.

Prearranged funeral service contracts funded through insurance shall contain language which:

(1) States the amount of insurance;

(2) Informs the purchaser of the name and address of the insurance company through which the insurance will be provided and the name of the beneficiary;

(3) Informs the purchaser that amounts paid for insurance may not be refundable;

(4) Informs that any funds from the policy not used for services may be subject to a claim for reimbursement for long-term care services paid for by the state; and

(5) States that for purposes of the contract, the procedures in RCW 18.39.250(11)(b) shall control such recoupment.

[ 2005 c 365 s 22; 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 63; 1989 c 390 s 4.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 74.39A.030.